Idaho, session 2026, H0702.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 28-8-110, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
28-8-110. APPLICABILITY AND CHOICE OF LAW. (1) The local law of the is-
suer's jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (4) of this section, gov-
erns:
(a) The validity of a security;
(b) The rights and duties of the issuer with respect to registration of
transfer;
(c) The effectiveness of registration of transfer by the issuer;
(d) Whether the issuer owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a secu-
rity; and
(e) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to whom
transfer of a certificated or uncertificated security is registered or
a person who obtains control of an uncertificated security.
(2) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction, as
specified in subsection (5) of this section, Idaho governs:
(a) Acquisition of a security entitlement from the securities interme-
diary;
(b) The rights and duties of the securities intermediary and entitle-
ment holder arising out of a security entitlement;
(c) Whether the securities intermediary owes any duties to an adverse
claimant to a security entitlement; and
(d) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person who ac-
quires a security entitlement from the securities intermediary or a
person who purchases a security entitlement or interest therein from an
entitlement holder.
(3) The local law of the jurisdiction in which a security certificate
is located at the time of delivery governs whether an adverse claim can be
asserted against a person to whom the security certificate is delivered.
(4) "Issuer's jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction under which the is-
suer of the security is organized or, if permitted by the law of that juris-


diction, the law of another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An is-
suer organized under the law of this state may specify the law of another ju-
risdiction as the law governing the matters specified in subsections (1)(b)
through (1)(e) of this section.
(5) The following rules determine a "securities intermediary's juris-
diction" for purposes of this section:
(a) If an agreement between the securities intermediary and its en-
titlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides
that a particular jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's ju-
risdiction for purposes of this part, this chapter, or this act, that
jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(b) If paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply and an agreement
between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder gov-
erning the securities account expressly provides that the agreement is
governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is
the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(c) If neither paragraph (a) nor paragraph (b) of this section applies
and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitle-
ment holder governing the securities account expressly provides that
the securities account is maintained at an office in a particular juris-
diction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdic-
tion.
(d) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the securities interme-
diary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified
in an account statement as the office serving the entitlement holder's
account is located.
(e) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the securities interme-
diary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive
office of the securities intermediary is located.
(6) A securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not determined by the
physical location of certificates representing financial assets, or by the
jurisdiction in which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with re-
spect to which an entitlement holder has a security entitlement, or by the
location of facilities for data processing or other recordkeeping concern-
ing the account.
SECTION 2. That Section 28-8-503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
28-8-503. PROPERTY INTEREST OF ENTITLEMENT HOLDER IN FINANCIAL ASSET
HELD BY SECURITIES INTERMEDIARY. (1) To the extent necessary for a secu-
rities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with respect to
a particular financial asset, all interests in that financial asset held
by the securities intermediary are held by the securities intermediary for
the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary,
and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary,
except as otherwise provided in section 28-8-511.
(2) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a partic-
ular financial asset under subsection (1) of this section is a pro rata prop-
erty interest in all interests in that financial asset held by the securities
intermediary, without regard to the time the entitlement holder acquired the


security entitlement or the time the securities intermediary acquired the
interest in that financial asset.
(3) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a par-
ticular financial asset under subsection (1) of this section may be enforced
against the securities intermediary only by exercise of the entitlement
holder's rights under sections 28-8-505 through 28-8-508, Idaho Code.
(4) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a par-
ticular financial asset under subsection (1) of this section may be enforced
against a purchaser of the financial asset or interest therein only if:
(a) Insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or against the secu-
rities intermediary;
(b) The securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in
the financial asset to satisfy the security entitlements of all of its
entitlement holders to that financial asset;
(c) The securities intermediary violated its obligations under section
28-8-504, Idaho Code, by transferring the financial asset or interest
therein to the purchaser; and
(d) The purchaser is not protected under subsection (5) of this sec-
tion.
The trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of all entitlement holders
having security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset,
may recover the financial asset, or interest therein, from the purchaser. If
the trustee or other liquidator elects not to pursue that right, an entitle-
ment holder whose security entitlement remains unsatisfied has the right to
recover its interest in the financial asset from the purchaser.
(5) An action based on the entitlement holder's property interest with
respect to a particular financial asset under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable
lien or other theory, may not be asserted against any purchaser of a finan-
cial asset or interest therein who gives value, obtains control, and does not
act in collusion with the securities intermediary in violating the securi-
ties intermediary's obligations under section 28-8-504, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 28-8-511, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
28-8-511. PRIORITY AMONG SECURITY INTERESTS AND ENTITLEMENT HOLD-
ERS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, if If a securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests
in a particular financial asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitle-
ment holders who have security entitlements to that financial asset and its
obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security
interest in that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other
than the creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.
(2) A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a secu-
rity interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has pri-
ority over claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders who
have security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the cred-
itor has control over the financial asset.
(3) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets
to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security en-


titlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a creditor
of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that financial as-
set, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of entitlement
holders.
SECTION 4. That Section 28-9-305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
28-9-305. LAW GOVERNING PERFECTION AND PRIORITY OF SECURITY INTERESTS
IN INVESTMENT PROPERTY. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c)
of this section, the following rules apply:
(1) While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the lo-
cal law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfec-
tion or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the
certificated security represented thereby.
(2) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction as specified in section
28-8-110(4), Idaho Code, governs perfection, the effect of perfection
or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in an uncer-
tificated security.
(3) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction as
specified in section 28-8-110(5) governs perfection, the effect of per-
fection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a
security entitlement or securities account.
(4) (3) The local law of the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction
governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the
priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity
account.
(b) The following rules determine a commodity intermediary's jurisdic-
tion for purposes of this part:
(1) If an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity
customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that a par-
ticular jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for
purposes of this part, this chapter, or the uniform commercial code,
that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.
(2) If paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply and an agree-
ment between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer govern-
ing the commodity account expressly provides that the agreement is gov-
erned by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.
(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies and an
agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer
governing the commodity account expressly provides that the commodity
account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that
jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.
(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the commodity interme-
diary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified
in an account statement as the office serving the commodity customer's
account is located.
(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the commodity intermedi-
ary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive of-
fice of the commodity intermediary is located.


(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located
governs:
(1) Perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing;
(2) Automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property
created by a broker or securities intermediary; and
(3) Automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract
or commodity account created by a commodity intermediary.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.